District of Columbia statutes.
5-116.32

Body-Worn Camera Program; rulemaking requirement.

(a)

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], and in accordance with this section, shall issue rules regarding the Metropolitan Police Department’s Body-Worn Camera Program. The rules, at a minimum, shall provide:

(1)

Standards for public access to body-worn camera recordings;

(2)

Policies for retaining body-worn camera recordings;

(3)

Procedures for auditing the Body-Worn Camera Program;

(4)

Policies for protecting the security and integrity of body-worn camera data; and

(5)

Mechanisms for cost recovery of Freedom of Information Act requests.

(b)

The Mayor shall establish and consult with an advisory group to provide recommendations for the proposed rules required by subsection (c) of this section. The advisory group shall consist of one representative from each of the following agencies and organizations:

(1)

The Committee on the Judiciary of the Council of the District of Columbia;

(2)

The Office of Police Complaints;

(3)

The Office of Open Government of the Board of Ethics and Government Accountability;

(4)

The Fraternal Order of Police, D.C. Police Union;

(5)

The Electronic Privacy and Information Center;

(6)

The D.C. Coalition Against Domestic Violence;

(7)

The American Civil Liberties Union of the National Capital Area;

(8)

The Reporters Committee for Freedom of the Press;

(9)

The D.C. Open Government Coalition;

(10)

The Office of the Attorney General;

(11)

The United States Attorney’s Office for the District of Columbia; and

(12)

The Public Defender Service for the District of Columbia.

(c)

The Mayor shall submit the proposed rules required by this section to the Council by October 1, 2015, for a 45-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed rules, in whole or in part, by resolution, within this 45-day period of review, the proposed rules shall be deemed disapproved.

History

Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 3003, 62 DCR 10905

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 days) restriction on the use of body-worn cameras, see § 6 of the Fiscal Year 2015 and Fiscal Year 2016 Revised Budget Request Adjustment Temporary Act of 2015 (D.C. Law (Act 21-171), Dec. __, 2015, 62 DCR 13979).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 3003 of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).